src-fst-morphology-root.lexc.md
## Tags for originating language
The following tags are used to guide conversion to IPA: loan words
and foreign names are usually pronounced (approximately) as in the
originating (majority) language. Instead of trying to identify the
correct pronunciation based on phonotactics (orthotactics actually),
we tag all words that can't be correctly transcribed using the SME
transcriber with source language codes. Once tagged, it is possible
to split the lexical transducer in smaller ones according to langu-
age, and apply different IPA conversion to each of them.
The principle of tagging is that we only tag to the extent needed,
and following a priority:
1. any untagged word is pronounced with SME orthographic conventions
1. NNO and NOB have identical pronunciation, NNO is only used if
different in spelling from NOB
1. SWE has mostly the same pronunciation as NOB, and is only used
if different in spelling from NOB
1. Occasionally even SME (the default) may be tagged, to block other
languages from being specified, mainly during semi-automatic
language tagging sessions
All in all, we want to get as much correctly transcribed to IPA
with as little work as possible. On the other hand, if more words
are tagged than strictly needed, this should pose no problem as
long as the IPA conversion is correct - at least some words will
get the same pronunciation whether read as SME or NOB/NNO/SWE.
* +OLang/SME - North Sámi
* +OLang/SMS - Skolt Sámi
* +OLang/SMA - South Sámi
* +OLang/FIN - Finnish
* +OLang/SWE - Swedish
* +OLang/NOB - Norw. bokmål
* +OLang/NNO - Norw. nynorsk
* +OLang/ENG - English
* +OLang/HUN - Hungarian
* +OLang/RUS - Russian
* +OLang/UND - Undefined
* +OLang/PARA - parallelle navn, navnet skal ikke overføres til andre samisk språk

## Flag diacritics
Tags from SME, coming to smj by propernouns.

## Flag diacritics

We have manually optimised the structure of our lexicon using following
flag diacritics to restrict morhpological combinatorics - only allow compounds
with verbs if the verb is further derived into a noun again:

|               Flag diacritic | Explanation
|               :------------- |:-----------
|  @P.NeedNoun.ON@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
|  @D.NeedNoun.ON@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
|  @C.NeedNoun@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised

|               Flag diacritic | Explanation
|               :------------- |:-----------
|  @P.Pmatch.Loc@ | Used on multi-token analyses; tell hfst-tokenise/pmatch where in the form/analysis the token should be split. Used e.g. in `bijladagi` to split `bijla` from `dagi`, or after abbreviations with full stops before the full stop, to allow an alternate `+CLB` analysis of it in case of a sentence final abbreviation. __NB!__ This will give a faulty lemma for the abbreviation, as it will not include the full stop. This can lead to other issues, but presently we have no other solution if we want to keep the full stopp as a separate token. We could leave a full stop at the end of the abbreviation lemma as well (but not on the input side - we only have one full stop in the input). That must be tested, it could work, but then requires special attention when generating suggestions in e.g. grammar checkers - it should not generate two full stops. 
|  @P.Pmatch.Backtrack@ | Used on single-token analyses; tell hfst-tokenise/pmatch to backtrack by reanalysing the substrings before and after this point in the form (to find combinations of shorter analyses that would otherwise be missed)

|               Flag diacritic | Explanation
|               :------------- |:-----------
| @D.ErrOrth.ON@ | To be written
| @R.ErrOrth.ON@ | To be written
| @C.ErrOrth@ | To be written
| @P.ErrOrth.ON@ | To be written

For languages that allow compounding, the following flag diacritics are needed
to control position-based compounding restrictions for nominals. Their use is
handled automatically if combined with +CmpN/xxx tags. If not used, they will
do no harm.

|              Flag diacritic | Explanation
|              :------------- |:-----------
|  @P.CmpFrst.FALSE@ | Require that words tagged as such only appear first
|  @D.CmpPref.TRUE@ | Block such words from entering ENDLEX
|  @P.CmpPref.FALSE@ | Block these words from making further compounds
|  @D.CmpLast.TRUE@ | Block such words from entering R
|  @D.CmpNone.TRUE@ | Combines with the next tag to prohibit compounding
|  @U.CmpNone.FALSE@ | Combines with the prev tag to prohibit compounding
|  @U.CmpNone.TRUE@ | Combines with the two previous ones to block compounding
|  @P.CmpOnly.TRUE@ | Sets a flag to indicate that the word has passed R
|  @D.CmpOnly.FALSE@ | Disallow words coming directly from root.
|  @U.CmpHyph.FALSE@ | Flag to control hyphenated compounds like proper nouns
|  @U.CmpHyph.TRUE@ | Flag to control hyphenated compounds like proper nouns
|  @C.CmpHyph@ | Flag to control hyphenated compounds like proper nouns

Use the following flag diacritics to control downcasing of derived proper
nouns (e.g. Finnish Pariisi -> pariisilainen). See e.g. North Sámi for how to use
these flags. There exists a ready-made regex that will do the actual down-casing
given the proper use of these flags.

|           Flag diacritic | Explanation
|           :------------- |:-----------
|  @U.Cap.Obl@ | Disallow downcasing of names when not derived: Deatnu
|  @U.Cap.Opt@ | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj.
|  @P.Px.add@ | Giving possibility for Px-suffixes (all except from Nom 3.p)
|  @R.Px.add@ | Requiring P.Px.add-flag for Px-suffixes (all except from Nom 3.p)
|  @P.Nom3Px.add@ | Giving possibility for Px-suffixes Nom 3.p
|  @R.Nom3Px.add@ | Requiring P.Nom3Px.add flag for Px-suffixes Nom 3.p

* **@R.SpellRlx.ON@** Flag used to tag spell-relax-analysed strings (and only those).
* **@D.SpellRlx.ON@** Flag used to tag spell-relax-analysed strings (and only those).
* **@C.SpellRlx@** Flag used to tag spell-relax-analysed strings (and only those).

* **@R.SpaceCmp.ON@** Flag to tag compounds written with a space
* **@D.SpaceCmp.ON@** Flag to tag compounds written with a space
* **@C.SpaceCmp@** Flag to tag compounds written with a space+

|              Flag diacritic | Explanation
|              :------------- |:-----------
|  @U.number.one@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @U.number.two@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @U.number.three@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @U.number.four@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @U.number.five@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @U.number.six@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @U.number.seven@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @U.number.eight@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @U.number.nine@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @U.number.zero@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;

| @P.number.one@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.two@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.three@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.four@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.five@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.six@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.seven@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.eight@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.nine@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.ten@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.one@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.two@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.three@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.four@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.five@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.six@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.seven@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.eight@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.nine@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.ten@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.one@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.two@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.three@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.four@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.five@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.six@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.seven@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.eight@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.nine@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.ten@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;

# Lexicon `Root`

The beginning of everything. Every FST defined in LexC must start with the
reserved lexicon name `Root`.

* **LEXICON Acronym**

* **LEXICON ProperNoun**

# Lexicon ENDLEX
And this is the ENDLEX of everything:
```
@D.CmpOnly.FALSE@@D.CmpPref.TRUE@@D.NeedNoun.ON@ ENDLEX2 ;
```
The `@D.CmpOnly.FALSE@` flag diacritic is ued to disallow words tagged
with +CmpNP/Only to end here.
The `@D.NeedNoun.ON@` flag diacritic is used to block illegal compounds.

**ENDLEX2**

**ENDLEX3**

**ENDLEX4**

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/root.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-smj/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/root.lexc)</small>
